Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER; CUSTOMER SERVICE SURVEY AND REPORT ON APPLICATIONS FOR PUBLIC ASSISTANCE SERVICES.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of human services shall work with lead agencies to develop a customer service survey for medical assistance applicants and long-term services and supports applicants by October 1, 2025. The customer service survey must be offered to each individual applying for medical assistance or long-term services and supports between November 1, 2025, and May 31, 2026, and must collect information on the applicant's satisfaction with wait times and form complexity. new text end new text begin (b) By November 1, 2026, the commissioner shall submit a report on medical assistance applications and long-term services and supports applications, including recommendations for legislative changes, to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services. In preparing the report, the commissioner must: (1) utilize information gathered from the direction to the commissioner in Laws 2017, First Special Session chapter 6, article 1, section 51; (2) utilize information gathered from the customer service surveys in paragraph (a); and (3) consult with lead agencies responsible for administering medical assistance applications and long-term services and supports applications throughout the state. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner shall report findings and make legislative recommendations on the following: new text end new text begin (1) summarizing customer service survey results and trends; new text end new text begin (2) reducing application and assessment times; new text end new text begin (3) increasing efficacy of application, assessment, and reassessment training of lead agency staff; new text end new text begin (4) developing an expedited application process for applicants who previously resided in neighboring states and received Medicaid or long-term services and supports; new text end new text begin (5) developing applications for medical assistance and long-term services and supports that automatically populate duplicate information; new text end new text begin (6) using technology to efficiently manage caseloads, applications, assessments, and reassessments; new text end new text begin (7) aligning similar requirements for different public assistance services to reduce application length and duplication; new text end new text begin (8) developing best practices for lead agency staff to administer applications, assessments, and reassessments to uniformly administer throughout the state; new text end new text begin (9) developing unified points of intake, application, and eligibility determination for public assistance services; and new text end new text begin (10) identifying necessary federal waivers to implement any legislation recommendations. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner shall also report on the cost, time, and resources necessary to develop a computerized interactive eligibility form that adapts to the applicant's answers to reduce duplicative information when applying for related public assistance services administered by the Department of Human Services and the Department of Children, Youth, and Families. new text end